Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-527
Elections; rules governing; power to prescribe.

Cities of the second class and villages shall have power to prescribe the manner of conducting all municipal elections and the return of such elections and for holding special elections for any purpose provided by law.

Laws 1879, § 69, XI, p. 213;

Laws 1881, c. 23, § 8, XI, p. 175;

Laws 1885, c. 20, § 1, XI, p. 166;

Laws 1887, c. 12, § 1, XI, p. 294;

R.S.1913, § 5117;

C.S.1922, § 4290;

C.S.1929, § 17-439;

R.S.1943, § 17-527;

Laws 1959, c. 60, § 55, p. 272;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 144.